Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 23-901, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-901. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Award" means the finding or decision of an administrative law judge or the commission as to the amount of compensation or benefit due an injured employee or the dependents of a deceased employee. 2. "Client" means an individual, association, company, firm, partnership, corporation or any other legally recognized entity that is subject to this chapter and that enters into a professional employer agreement with a professional employer organization. 3. "Co-employee" means every person employed by an injured employee's employer. 4. "Commission" means the industrial commission of Arizona. 5. "Compensation" means the compensation and benefits provided by this chapter. 6. "Employee", "workman", "worker" and "operative" means: (a) Every person in the service of this state or a county, city, town, municipal corporation or school district, including regular members of lawfully constituted police and fire departments of cities and towns, whether by election, appointment or contract of hire. (b) Every person in the service of any employer subject to this chapter, including aliens and minors legally or illegally allowed to work for hire, but not including a person whose employment is both: (i) Casual. (ii) Not in the usual course of the trade, business or occupation of the employer. (c) Lessees of mining property and the lessees' employees and contractors engaged in the performance of work that is a part of the business conducted by the lessor and over which the lessor retains supervision or control are within the meaning of this paragraph employees of the lessor, and are deemed to be drawing wages as are usually paid employees for similar work. The lessor may deduct from the proceeds of ores mined by the lessees the premium required by this chapter to be paid for such employees. (d) Regular members of volunteer fire departments organized pursuant to title 48, chapter 5, article 1, regular firefighters of any volunteer fire department, including private fire protection service organizations, organized pursuant to title 10, chapters 24 through 40, volunteer firefighters serving as members of a fire department of any incorporated city or town or an unincorporated area without pay or without full pay and on a part-time basis, and voluntary policemen peace officers and volunteer firefighters serving in any incorporated city, town or unincorporated area without pay or without full pay and on a part-time basis, are deemed to be employees, but for the purposes of this chapter, the basis for computing wages for premium payments and compensation benefits for regular members of volunteer fire departments organized pursuant to title 48, chapter 5, article 1, or organized pursuant to title 10, chapters 24 through 40, regular members of any private fire protection service organization, volunteer firefighters and volunteer policemen peace officers of these departments or organizations shall be the salary equal to the beginning salary of the same rank or grade in the full-time service with the city, town, volunteer fire department or private fire protection service organization, provided if there is no full-time equivalent then the salary equivalent shall be as determined by resolution of the governing body of the city, town or volunteer fire department or corporation. (e) Members of the department of public safety reserve, organized pursuant to section 41-1715, are deemed to be employees.  For the purposes of this chapter, the basis for computing wages for premium payments and compensation benefits for a member of the department of public safety reserve who is a peace officer shall be the salary received by officers of the department of public safety for the officers' first month of regular duty as an officer. For members of the department of public safety reserve who are not peace officers, the basis for computing premiums and compensation benefits is $400 a month. (f) Any person placed in on-the-job evaluation or in on-the-job training under the department of economic security's temporary assistance for needy families program or vocational rehabilitation program shall be deemed to be an employee of the department for the purpose of coverage under the state workers' compensation laws only. The basis for computing premium payments and compensation benefits shall be $200 per month.  Any person receiving vocational rehabilitation services under the department of economic security's vocational rehabilitation program whose major evaluation or training activity is academic, whether as an enrolled attending student or by correspondence, or who is confined to a hospital or penal institution, shall not be deemed to be an employee of the department for any purpose. (g) Regular members of a volunteer sheriff's reserve, which may be established by resolution of the county board of supervisors, to assist the sheriff in the performance of the sheriff's official duties.  A roster of the current members shall monthly be certified to the clerk of the board of supervisors by the sheriff and shall not exceed the maximum number authorized by the board of supervisors. Certified members of an authorized volunteer sheriff's reserve shall be deemed to be employees of the county for the purpose of coverage under the Arizona workers' compensation laws and occupational disease disability laws and shall be entitled to receive the benefits of these laws for any compensable injuries or disabling conditions that arise out of and occur in the course of the performance of duties authorized and directed by the sheriff.  Compensation benefits and premium payments shall be based on the salary received by a regular full-time deputy sheriff of the county involved for the first month of regular patrol duty as an officer for each certified member of a volunteer sheriff's reserve. This subdivision does not provide compensation coverage for any member of a sheriff's posse who is not a certified member of an authorized volunteer sheriff's reserve except as a participant in a search and rescue mission or a search and rescue training mission. (h) A working member of a partnership may be deemed to be an employee entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter on written acceptance, by endorsement, at the discretion of the insurance carrier for the partnership of an application for coverage by the working partner.  The basis for computing premium payments and compensation benefits for the working partner shall be an assumed average monthly wage of not less than $600 or more than the maximum wage provided in section 23-1041 and is subject to the discretionary approval of the insurance carrier. Any compensation for permanent partial or permanent total disability payable to the partner is computed on the lesser of the assumed monthly wage agreed to by the insurance carrier on the acceptance of the application for coverage or the actual average monthly wage received by the partner at the time of injury. (i) The sole proprietor of a business subject to this chapter may be deemed to be an employee entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter on written acceptance, by endorsement, at the discretion of the insurance carrier of an application for coverage by the sole proprietor.  The basis for computing premium payments and compensation benefits for the sole proprietor is an assumed average monthly wage of not less than $600 or more than the maximum wage provided by section 23-1041 and is subject to the discretionary approval of the insurance carrier. Any compensation for permanent partial or permanent total disability payable to the sole proprietor shall be computed on the lesser of the assumed monthly wage agreed to by the insurance carrier on the acceptance of the application for coverage or the actual average monthly wage received by the sole proprietor at the time of injury. (j) A member of the Arizona national guard, Arizona state guard or unorganized militia shall be deemed a state employee and entitled to coverage under the Arizona workers' compensation law at all times while the member is receiving the payment of the member's military salary from this state under competent military orders or on order of the governor. Compensation benefits shall be based on the monthly military pay rate to which the member is entitled at the time of injury, but not less than a salary of $400 per month or more than the maximum provided by the workers' compensation law. Arizona compensation benefits shall not inure to a member compensable under federal law. (k) Certified ambulance drivers and attendants who serve without pay or without full pay on a part-time basis are deemed to be employees and entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter and the basis for computing wages for premium payments and compensation benefits for certified ambulance personnel shall be $400 per month. (l) Volunteer workers of a licensed health care institution may be deemed to be employees and entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter on written acceptance by the insurance carrier of an application by the health care institution for coverage of such volunteers. The basis for computing wages for premium payments and compensation benefits for volunteers shall be $400 per month. (m) Personnel who participate in a search or rescue operation or a search or rescue training operation that carries a mission identifier assigned by the division of emergency management as provided in section 35-192.01 and who serve without compensation as volunteer state employees.  The basis for computation of wages for premium purposes and compensation benefits is the total volunteer man-hours recorded by the division of emergency management in a given quarter multiplied by the amount determined by the appropriate risk management formula. (n) Personnel who participate in emergency management training, exercises or drills that are duly enrolled or registered with the division of emergency management or any political subdivision as provided in section 26-314, subsection C and who serve without compensation as volunteer state employees. The basis for computation of wages for premium purposes and compensation benefits is the total volunteer man-hours recorded by the division of emergency management or political subdivision during a given training session, exercise or drill multiplied by the amount determined by the appropriate risk management formula. (o) Regular members of the Arizona game and fish department reserve, organized pursuant to section 17-214.  The basis for computing wages for premium payments and compensation benefits for a member of the reserve is the salary received by game rangers and wildlife managers of the Arizona game and fish department for the game rangers' and wildlife managers' first month of regular duty. (p) Every person employed pursuant to a professional employer agreement. (q) A working member of a limited liability company who owns less than fifty percent of the membership interest in the limited liability company. (r) A working member of a limited liability company who owns fifty percent or more of the membership interest in the limited liability company may be deemed to be an employee entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter on the written acceptance, by endorsement, of an application for coverage by the working member at the discretion of the insurance carrier for the limited liability company. The basis for computing wages for premium payments and compensation benefits for the working member is an assumed average monthly wage of $600 or more but not more than the maximum wage provided in section 23-1041 and is subject to the discretionary approval of the insurance carrier. Any compensation for permanent partial or permanent total disability payable to the working member is computed on the lesser of the assumed monthly wage agreed to by the insurance carrier on the acceptance of the application for coverage or the actual average monthly wage received by the working member at the time of injury. (s) A working shareholder of a corporation who owns less than fifty percent of the beneficial interest in the corporation. (t) A working shareholder of a corporation who owns fifty percent or more of the beneficial interest in the corporation may be deemed to be an employee entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter on the written acceptance, by endorsement, of an application for coverage by the working shareholder at the discretion of the insurance carrier for the corporation. The basis for computing wages for premium payments and compensation benefits for the working shareholder is an assumed average monthly wage of $600 or more but not more than the maximum wage provided in section 23-1041 and is subject to the discretionary approval of the insurance carrier. Any compensation for permanent partial or permanent total disability payable to the working shareholder is computed on the lesser of the assumed monthly wage agreed to by the insurance carrier on the acceptance of the application for coverage or the actual average monthly wage received by the working shareholder at the time of injury. 7. "First responder" means an employee of this state or a political subdivision of this state who provides emergency response services and includes any of the following: (a) A peace officer. (b) A firefighter as defined in section 9-500.47. (c) A paramedic as defined in section 36-2201. (d) An emergency medical care technician as defined in section 36-2201. (e) A public safety telecommunicator. 7. 8. "General order" means an order applied generally throughout this state to all persons under jurisdiction of the commission. 8. 9. "Heart-related or perivascular injury, illness or death" means myocardial infarction, coronary thrombosis or any other similar sudden, violent or acute process involving the heart or perivascular system, or any death resulting therefrom, and any weakness, disease or other condition of the heart or perivascular system, or any death resulting therefrom. 9. 10. "Insurance carrier" means every insurance carrier duly authorized by the director of the department of insurance and financial institutions to write workers' compensation or occupational disease compensation insurance in this state. 10. 11. "Interested party" means the employer, the employee, or if the employee is deceased, the employee's estate, the surviving spouse or dependents, the commission, the insurance carrier, the third-party administrator or an authorized representative. 11. 12. "Mental injury, illness or condition" means any mental, emotional, psychotic or neurotic injury, illness or condition. 12. 13. "Order" means and includes any rule, direction, requirement, standard, determination or decision other than an award or a directive by the commission or an administrative law judge relative to any entitlement to compensation benefits, or to the amount of compensation benefits, and any procedural ruling relative to the processing or adjudicating of a compensation matter. 13. 14. "Personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of employment" means any of the following: (a) Personal injury by accident arising out of and in the course of employment. (b) An injury caused by the wilful act of a third person directed against an employee because of the employee's employment, but does not include a disease unless resulting from the injury. (c) An occupational disease that is due to causes and conditions characteristic of and peculiar to a particular trade, occupation, process or employment, and not the ordinary diseases to which the general public is exposed, and subject to any of the following: (i) Section 23-901.01. or (ii) section 23-901.09. or, (iii) For heart-related, perivascular or pulmonary cases, section 23-1105. (iv) For post-traumatic stress disorder cases, section 23-1106. 15. "Public safety TELECOMMUNICATOR": (a) Means an individual employed by a primary or secondary public safety emergency communications center as the initial first RESPONDER whose primary responsibility is to receive, process, transmit or dispatch emergency and nonemergency calls for service by law enforcement, fire, emergency medical or other public safety services through telephone, radio or another communications device. (b) Includes any public safety answering point operations employee who meets the skill and training requirements as required in this state and includes emergency communications center employees, call handling employees, commuter aided dispatch equipment employees or any other employee who assists the public safety answering point operations, when needed. 14. 16. "Professional employer agreement" means a written contract between a client and a professional employer organization: (a) In which the professional employer organization expressly agrees to co-employ all or a majority of the employees providing services for the client. In determining whether the professional employer organization employs all or a majority of the employees of a client, any person employed pursuant to the terms of the professional employer agreement after the initial placement of client employees on the payroll of the professional employer organization shall be included. (b) That is intended to be ongoing rather than temporary in nature. (c) In which employer responsibilities for worksite employees, including hiring, firing and disciplining, are expressly allocated between the professional employer organization and the client in the agreement. 15. 17. "Professional employer organization" means any person engaged in the business of providing professional employer services. Professional employer organization does not include a temporary help firm or an employment agency. 16. 18. "Professional employer services" means the service of entering into co-employment relationships under this chapter to which all or a majority of the employees providing services to a client or to a division or work unit of a client are covered employees. 17. 19. "Serve" or "service" means either: (a) Mailing to the last known address of the receiving party. (b) Transmitting by electronic transmission in a manner reasonably calculated to achieve effective notice unless the receiving party opts out by providing written notice to the other party. 18. 20. "Special order" means an order other than a general order. 19. 21. "Weakness, disease or other condition of the heart or perivascular system" means arteriosclerotic heart disease, cerebral vascular disease, peripheral vascular disease, cardiovascular disease, angina pectoris, congestive heart trouble, coronary insufficiency, ischemia and all other similar weaknesses, diseases and conditions, and also previous episodes or instances of myocardial infarction, coronary thrombosis or any similar sudden, violent or acute process involving the heart or perivascular system. 20. 22. "Workers' compensation" means workmen's compensation as used in article XVIII, section 8, Constitution of Arizona. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 23-901.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-901.01. Occupational disease; proximate causation; presumption; definition A. The occupational diseases as defined by section 23-901, paragraph 13 14, subdivision (c) shall be deemed to arise out of the employment only if all of the following six requirements exist: 1. There is a direct causal connection between the conditions under which the work is performed and the occupational disease. 2. The disease can be seen to have followed as a natural incident of the work as a result of the exposure occasioned by the nature of the employment. 3. The disease can be fairly traced to the employment as the proximate cause. 4. The disease does not come from a hazard to which workers would have been equally exposed outside of the employment. 5. The disease is incidental to the character of the business and not independent of the relation of employer and employee. 6. The disease after its contraction appears to have had its origin in a risk connected with the employment, and to have flowed from that source as a natural consequence, although it need not have been foreseen or expected. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section and section 23-1043.01, any disease, infirmity or impairment of a peace officer's health that is caused by brain, bladder, rectal or colon cancer, lymphoma, leukemia or adenocarcinoma or mesothelioma of the respiratory tract and that results in disability or death is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 13 14, subdivision (c) and is deemed to arise out of employment. C. The presumption provided in subsection B of this section is granted if all of the following apply: 1. The peace officer passed a physical examination before employment and the examination did not indicate evidence of cancer. 2. The peace officer was assigned to hazardous duty for at least five years. D. Subsection B of this section applies to both of the following: 1. Peace officers currently in service. 2. Former peace officers who are sixty-five years of age or younger and who are diagnosed with a cancer that is listed in subsection B of this section not more than fifteen years after the peace officer's last date of employment as a peace officer. E. Subsection B of this section does not apply to cancers of the respiratory tract if there is evidence that the peace officer's exposure to cigarettes or tobacco products outside of the scope of the peace officer's official duties is a substantial contributing cause in the development of the cancer. F. The presumption provided in subsection B of this section may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that there is a specific cause of the cancer other than an occupational exposure to a carcinogen as defined by the international agency for research on cancer. G. For the purposes of this section, "peace officer" means a full-time peace officer who was regularly assigned to hazardous duty as a part of a special operations, special weapons and tactics, explosive ordinance disposal or hazardous materials response unit. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 23-901.04, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-901.04. Compensation precluded by misconduct, self-exposure or disobedience of orders of commission; definition A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no an employee or dependent of an employee shall be is not entitled to receive compensation for disability from an occupational disease, as defined by section 23-901, paragraph 13 14, subdivision (c), when such disability was caused either wholly or partly by the wilful misconduct, wilful self-exposure or disobedience to such reasonable rules and regulations adopted by the employer and which that have been and are kept posted in conspicuous places in and about the premises of the employer, or otherwise brought to the attention of the employee. B. As used in this section the term "wilful self-exposure" includes: 1. Failure or omission on the part of an employee or applicant for employment truthfully to state in writing to the best of his the employee's or applicant's knowledge in answer to an inquiry made by the employer, the place, duration and nature of previous employment. 2. Failure or omission on the part of an applicant for employment truthfully to state in writing to the best of his the applicant's knowledge in answer to an inquiry made by the employer, whether or not he the applicant had previously been a person with a disability, laid off or compensated in damages or otherwise because of any physical disability. 3. Failure or omission on the part of an employee or applicant for employment truthfully to give in writing to the best of his the employee's or applicant's knowledge in answer to an inquiry made by the employer, full information about the previous status of his health, previous medical and hospital attention and direct and continuous exposure to active pulmonary tuberculosis. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 23-901.05, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-901.05. Occupational disease aggravated by other disease or other disease aggravated by occupational disease; effect on compensation Where an occupational disease, as defined by section 23-901, paragraph 13 14, subdivision (c), is aggravated by any other disease or infirmity not itself compensable, or where disability or death from any other cause not itself compensable is aggravated, prolonged, accelerated or in anywise contributed to by an occupational disease, the compensation payable under this chapter shall be reduced and limited to such a proportion only of the compensation that would be payable if the occupational disease were the sole cause of the disability or death, as such the occupational disease as a causative factor bears to all the causes of such the disability or death. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 23-901.09, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-901.09. Presumption; cancers; firefighters and fire investigators; applicability; definitions A. Notwithstanding section 23-901.01, subsection A and section 23-1043.01: 1. Any disease, infirmity or impairment of a firefighter's or fire investigator's health that is caused by brain, bladder, rectal or colon cancer, lymphoma, leukemia or adenocarcinoma or mesothelioma of the respiratory tract and that results in disability or death is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 13 14, subdivision (c) and is deemed to arise out of employment. 2. Any disease, infirmity or impairment of a firefighter's or fire investigator's health that is caused by buccal cavity, pharynx, esophagus, large intestine, lung, kidney, prostate, skin, stomach, ovarian, breast or testicular cancer or non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, multiple myeloma or malignant melanoma and that results in disability or death is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 13 14, subdivision (c) and is deemed to arise out of employment. B. The presumptions provided in subsection A of this section are granted if all of the following apply: 1. The firefighter or fire investigator passed a physical examination before employment and the examination did not indicate evidence of cancer. 2. The firefighter or fire investigator was assigned to hazardous duty for at least five years. 3. For the presumption provided in subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section and for firefighters only, the firefighter received a physical examination that is reasonably aligned with the national fire protection association standard on comprehensive occupational medical program for fire departments (NFPA 1582). C. Subsection A of this section applies to both of the following: 1. Firefighters or fire investigators currently in service. 2. Former firefighters or fire investigators who are sixty-five years of age or younger and who are diagnosed with a cancer that is listed in subsection A of this section not more than fifteen years after the firefighter's or fire investigator's last date of employment as a firefighter or fire investigator. D. Subsection A of this section does not apply to cancers of the respiratory tract if there is evidence that the firefighter's or fire investigator's exposure to cigarettes or tobacco products outside of the scope of the firefighter's or fire investigator's official duties is a substantial contributing cause in the development of the cancer. E. The presumption provided in subsection A of this section may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that there is a specific cause of the cancer other than an occupational exposure to a carcinogen as defined by the international agency for research on cancer. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Firefighter" means a full-time firefighter who was regularly assigned to hazardous duty. 2. "Fire investigator" means a person who is employed full time by a municipality or fire district and who is trained in the process of and responsible for determining the origin, cause and development of a fire or explosion. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 23-1061, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-1061. Notice of accident; form of notice; claim for compensation; reopening; payment of compensation; notification of injury A. Notwithstanding section 23-908, subsection E, no a claim for compensation shall be is not valid or enforceable unless the claim is filed with the commission by the employee, or if resulting in death by the parties entitled to compensation, or someone on their behalf, in writing within one year after the injury occurred or the right thereto accrued. The time for filing a compensation claim begins to run when the injury becomes manifest or when the claimant knows or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should know that the claimant has sustained a compensable injury, except for an employee who currently RECEIVES licensed counseling, that employee has one year after the date of the last licensed counseling visit to file a claim. Except as provided in subsection B or N of this section, neither the commission nor any or a court shall does not have jurisdiction to consider a claim that is not timely filed under this subsection, except if the employee or other party entitled to file the claim has delayed in doing so because of justifiable reliance on a material representation by the commission, employer or insurance carrier or if the employee or other party entitled to file the claim is insane or legally incompetent or incapacitated at the time the injury occurs or the right to compensation accrues or during the one-year period thereafter. If the insanity or legal incompetence or incapacity occurs after the one-year period has commenced, the running of the remainder of the one-year period shall be is suspended during the period of insanity or legal incompetence or incapacity. If the employee or other party is insane or legally incompetent or incapacitated when the injury occurs or the right to compensation accrues, the one-year period commences to run immediately on the termination of insanity or legal incompetence or incapacity.  The commission on receiving a claim shall give notice to the insurance carrier. For the purposes of this subsection, "licensed counseling" has the same meaning prescribed in section 38-672. B. Failure of an employee or any other party entitled to compensation to file a claim with the commission within one year or to comply with section 23-908 shall not bar a claim if the insurance carrier or employer has commenced payment of compensation benefits under section 23-1044, 23-1045 or 23-1046, except that the payments provided for by section 23-1046, subsection A, paragraph 1 and section 23-1065, subsection A shall not be considered compensation benefits for the purposes of this section. C. If the commission receives a notification of the injury, the commission shall send a claim form to the employee. D. The issue of failure to file a claim must be raised at the first hearing on a claim for compensation in respect to the injury or death. E. Within ten days after receiving notice of an accident, the employer shall inform the employer's insurance carrier and the commission on such forms as may be prescribed by the commission. F. Each insurance carrier and self-insuring employer shall report to the commission a notice of the first payment of compensation and shall serve on the commission and the employee any denial of a claim, any change in the amount of compensation and the termination of compensation, except that claims for medical, surgical and hospital benefits that are not denied shall be reported to the commission in the form and manner determined by the commission.  In all cases where compensation is payable, the insurance carrier or self-insuring employer shall promptly determine the average monthly wage pursuant to section 23-1041. Within thirty days after the payment of the first installment of compensation, the insurance carrier or self-insuring employer shall notify the employee and commission of the average monthly wage of the claimant as calculated, and the basis for such determination. The commission shall then make its own independent determination of the average monthly wage pursuant to section 23-1041. The commission, within thirty days after receipt of such notice, shall notify the employee, employer and insurance carrier of such determination. The amount determined by the commission shall be payable retroactive to the first date of entitlement. The first payment of compensation shall be accompanied by a notice on a form prescribed by the commission stating the manner in which the amount of compensation was determined. G. Except as otherwise provided by law, the insurance carrier or self-insuring employer shall process and pay compensation and provide medical, surgical and hospital benefits, without the necessity for the making of an award or determination by the commission. H. On a claim that has been previously accepted, an employee may reopen the claim to secure an increase or rearrangement of compensation or additional benefits by filing with the commission a petition requesting the reopening of the employee's claim on the basis of a new, additional or previously undiscovered temporary or permanent condition, which petition shall be accompanied by a statement from a physician setting forth the physical condition of the employee relating to the claim. A claim shall not be reopened if the initial claim for compensation was previously denied by a notice of claim status or determination by the commission and the notice or determination was allowed to become final and no exception applies under section 23-947 excusing a late filing to request a hearing.  A claim shall not be reopened because of increased subjective pain if the pain is not accompanied by a change in objective physical findings. A claim shall not be reopened solely for additional diagnostic or investigative medical tests, but expenses for any reasonable and necessary diagnostic or investigative tests that are causally related to the injury shall be paid by the employer or the employer's insurance carrier.  Expenses for reasonable and necessary medical and hospital care and laboratory work shall be paid by the employer or the employer's insurance carrier if the claim is reopened as provided by law and if these expenses are incurred within fifteen days before the date that the petition to reopen is filed. The payment for such the reasonable and necessary medical, hospital and laboratory work expense shall be paid for by the employer or the employer's insurance carrier if the claim is reopened as provided by law and if such the expenses are incurred within fifteen days before the filing of the petition to reopen. Surgical benefits are not payable for any period before the date of filing a petition to reopen, except that surgical benefits are payable for a period before the date of filing the petition to reopen not to exceed seven days if a bona fide medical emergency precludes the employee from filing a petition to reopen before the surgery. No monetary compensation is payable for any period before the date of filing the petition to reopen. I. On the filing of a petition to reopen a claim, the commission shall in writing notify the employer's insurance carrier or the self-insuring employer, which shall in writing notify the commission and the employee within twenty-one days after the date of such the notice of its acceptance or denial of the petition. The reopened claim shall be processed thereafter in like manner as a new claim. J. The commission shall investigate and review any claim in which it appears to the commission that the claimant has not been granted the benefits to which such claimant is entitled.  If the commission determines that payment or denial of compensation is improper in any way, it shall hold a hearing pursuant to section 23-941 within sixty days after receiving notice of such impropriety. Any claim for temporary partial disability benefits under this subsection must be filed with the commission within two years after the date the claimed entitlement to compensation accrued or within two years after the date on which an award for benefits encompassing the entitlement period becomes final.  A claim for temporary partial disability compensation shall be deemed to accrue when the employee knew or with the exercise of reasonable diligence should have known that the insurance carrier, self-insured employer or special fund denied or improperly paid compensation. A claim for temporary partial disability benefits shall not be deemed to have accrued any earlier than September 26, 2008 October 6, 2024. K. When there is a dispute as to which employer or insurance carrier is liable for the payment of a compensable claim, the commission, by order, may designate the employer or insurance carrier that shall pay the claim. Payment shall begin within fourteen days after the employer or insurance carrier has been ordered by the commission to commence payment.  When a final determination has been made as to which employer or insurance carrier is actually liable, the commission shall direct any necessary monetary adjustment or reimbursement among the parties or insurance carriers involved. L. On application to the commission and for good cause shown, the commission may direct that a document filed as a claim for compensation benefits be designated as a petition to reopen, effective as of the original date of filing.  In like manner on application and good cause shown, the commission may direct that a document filed as a petition to reopen be designated as a claim for compensation benefits, effective as of the original date of filing. M. If the insurance carrier or self-insurer does not issue a notice of claim status denying the claim within twenty-one days after the date the insurance carrier is notified by the commission of a claim or of a petition to reopen, the insurance carrier shall pay immediately compensation as if the claim were accepted, from the date the insurance carrier is notified by the commission of a claim or petition to reopen until the date on which the insurance carrier issues a notice of claim status denying such claim. Compensation includes medical, surgical and hospital benefits. This section shall does not apply to cases involving seven days or less of time lost from work. N. If an insurance carrier or self-insured employer receives written notification of an injury from an employee who was injured and intends to file a claim for compensation, the insurance carrier or self-insured employer must forward the written notification of the injury and intended claim for compensation to the commission within seven business days and inform the employee of the employee's requirement to file a claim with the commission. The one-year period as prescribed in subsection A of this section is suspended from the date the insurance carrier or self-insured employer received written notification of the injury and intended claim for compensation until the date that the insurance carrier or self-insured employer forwards the written notification to the commission. When the commission receives such notification, the commission must notify the employee of the employee's responsibility to file a claim with the commission pursuant to this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 23-1105, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-1105. Heart-related, perivascular and pulmonary cases; firefighters; presumption; definition A. A heart-related, perivascular or pulmonary injury, illness or death of a firefighter is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 13 14, subdivision (c), compensable pursuant to section 23-1043.01 and deemed to arise out of employment if all of the following apply: 1. The firefighter passed a physical examination before employment and the examination did not indicate evidence of heart-related, perivascular or pulmonary injury or illness. 2. The firefighter received a physical examination that is reasonably aligned with the national fire protection association standard on comprehensive occupational medical program for fire departments (NFPA 1582). 3. The firefighter was exposed to a known event and the heart-related, perivascular or pulmonary injury, illness or death occurred within twenty-four hours after the exposure and was reasonably related to the exposure. B. The presumption provided in subsection A of this section may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that there is a specific cause of the heart-related, perivascular or pulmonary injury, illness or death other than the employment. C. Subsection A of this section does not apply if there is evidence that the firefighter's exposure to cigarettes or tobacco products outside the scope of the firefighter's official duties is a substantial contributing cause in the development of the heart-related, perivascular or pulmonary injury, illness or death. D. For the purposes of this section, "firefighter" means a firefighter or volunteer firefighter as described in section 23-901, paragraph 6, subdivision (d). END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Title 23, chapter 6, article 12, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-1106, to read: START_STATUTE23-1106. Post-traumatic stress disorder; first responders; presumption; definition A. Post-traumatic stress disorder: 1. Is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 14, subdivision (c). 2. Is compensable pursuant to section 23-1043.01. 3. Is deemed to arise out of and in the course of employment, if both of the following apply: (a) The first responder currently receives or has received licensed counseling pursuant to section 38-672. (b) A licensed mental health professional diagnosed the first responder with post-traumatic stress disorder due to performance of service-related job duties. B. The presumption provided in subsection A of this section may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that there is a specific cause of the post-traumatic stress disorder other than the employment. C. For the purposes of this section, "first responder" means a public safety employee who is eligible to receive licensed counseling as prescribed in section 38-672.END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 38-672, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-672. Traumatic event counseling for public safety employees; report; exceptions; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, this state or a political subdivision of this state shall establish a program to provide public safety employees who are exposed to any one of the following events while in the course of duty up to twelve visits of licensed counseling, which may be provided through telehealth, paid for by the employer: 1. In the case of any public safety employee: 1. (a) Visually or audibly Witnessing through audio or visual observation the death or maiming or visually or audibly witnessing the immediate aftermath of such a death or maiming of one or more human beings. 2. (b) Responding to or being directly involved in a criminal investigation of an offense involving a dangerous crime against children as defined in section 13-705. 3. (c) Requiring rescue in the line of duty where one's life was endangered. (d) Using deadly force or being subjected to deadly force in the course of duty, regardless of whether the public safety employee was physically injured. (e) Witnessing the death of another public safety employee through audio or visual observation while engaged in the course of duty. 2. In the case of a firefighter or peace officer, being exposed to a psychologically traumatic event or series of psychologically traumatic events in the course of the firefighter's or peace officer's employment. B. If the licensed Mental health professional determines that the public safety telecommunicator needs additional visits of licensed counseling beyond what a public safety employee is entitled to under subsection A of this section, the employer shall pay for up to an additional thirty-six visits. C. An employer may not: 1. Require a PUBLIC safety telecommunicator who is receiving licensed counseling pursuant to this section and who has not filed a claim for workers' compensation to undergo an independent medical examination. 2. Require a public safety telecommunicator who is RECEIVING licensed counseling pursuant to this section to use the public safety employee's accrued paid vacation, personal leave or sick leave if the public safety employee leaves work to receive treatment pursuant to this section. D. If the licensed mental health professional determines that the public safety telecommunicator is not fit to return to work while the public safety telecommunicator currently receives licensed counseling pursuant to this section, the licensed mental health professional shall notify the employer and the employer shall continue to provide the public safety telecommunicator with the same pay and benefits that the public safety telecommunicator RECEIVED before starting licensed counseling. E. An employer shall allow a public safety telecommunicator to select the public safety telecommunicator's own licensed mental health professional, except that if a licensed mental health professional declines to provide licensed counseling pursuant to this section, the employer is not required to secure the services of that licensed mental health professional.  The employer must pay the licensed mental health professional pursuant to the schedule of fees that is fixed by the industrial commission of arizona pursuant to section 23-908. B. F. Except as provided in section 23-1106, payment by the employer for licensed counseling pursuant to this section does not create a presumption that a claim is compensable under section 23-1043.01, subsection B. C. G. For each program established pursuant to this section, this state and each political subdivision of this state shall compile the following data: 1. The total number of public safety employees who have participated in the program. 2. The average number of visits per public safety employee. 3. The average number of months that a public safety employee participated in the program. 4. The average number of days that a public safety employee who participated in the program missed work. 5. The total number of public safety employees who participated in the program and who subsequently filed a workers' compensation claim and the number of those claims that were approved and the number of those claims that were denied. 6. For each employer, the total amount of work missed by public safety employees who participated in the program and how missed work was provided for by the employer or through employee benefits. D. H. On or before September 1 of each year, this state and each political subdivision of this state shall submit the data collected pursuant to subsection C  g of this section to the department of administration.  On or before October 1 of each year, the department of administration shall compile the data into a report and submit the report to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairperson of the senate health and human services committee, or its successor committee, the chairperson of the house of representatives health and human services committee, or its successor committee, the chairperson of the senate military affairs, public safety and border security committee, or its successor committee, and the chairperson of the house of representatives military affairs and public safety committee, or its successor committee, and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state.  Subsection C  g of this section and this subsection do not authorize this state or a political subdivision of this state to compile and report data that is protected under the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (P.L. 104-191; 110 Stat. 1936). E. I. This section does not apply to a state employer that provides a program to its public safety employees that is characterized by all of the following: 1. The program is paid for by the employer. 2. The program provides licensed counseling for any issue. For licensed counseling related to trauma experienced while in the line of duty, the licensed counseling is provided on the request of the public safety employee and is in person. 3. Before July 1, 2017 2026, the program offers at least six visits per year. 4. On or after July 1, 2017 2026, the program offers at least twelve visits per year. F. J. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Licensed counseling" means counseling provided by a licensed mental health professional. 2. "Licensed mental health professional" means a licensed individual who specializes in trauma and crisis, who uses evidence-based treatment options and who is one of the following: (a) A psychiatrist who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17. (b) A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 19.1. (c) A mental health professional who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 33 and who holds either a master's or doctoral degree related to the mental health profession. (d) A mental health nurse practitioner or a psychiatric clinical nurse specialist who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15. (e) A physician assistant who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 25. 3. "Public safety employee" : (a) means: (i) (a) Except as prescribed in subdivision (b) of this paragraph, An individual who is a member of the public safety personnel retirement system or the corrections officer retirement plan. (ii) (b) Except as prescribed in subdivision (b) of this paragraph, A probation officer, surveillance officer or juvenile detention officer who is employed by this state or a political subdivision of this state. (iii) (c) Except as prescribed in subdivision (b) of this paragraph, A 911 dispatcher in a primary or secondary public safety answering point or a public safety telecommunicator. (b) Does not include peace officers or firefighters. 4. "public safety telecommunicator" has the same meaning prescribed in section 23-901. END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Repeal Laws 2016, chapter 240, section 2, as amended by Laws 2022, chapter 377, section 2, is repealed. Sec. 11. Short title This act may be cited as the "Officer Craig Tiger Act".